California statutes. Public Resources Code
(A) Signage that is prominently displayed and easily visible to the consumer.

(B) Written materials provided to the consumer at the time of purchase or delivery, or both.

(C) Reference to the rechargeable batteries recycling opportunity in retailer advertising or other promotional materials, or both.

(D) Direct communications with the consumer at the time of purchase.

(c) An individual retailer location that is actively participating in the Rechargeable Battery Recycling Corporation’s or similar battery take-back and recycling program, and has implemented one or more of the public education components described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) shall be deemed in compliance with this article.

(d) If a retailer is participating in an existing battery recycling system that includes rechargeable batteries, in addition to any other type of batteries, and the system otherwise complies with the requirements of this article, the retailer may continue to participate in that existing system and is not required to implement or participate in a system that only includes rechargeable batteries.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 572, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Inoperative September 30, 2026, pursuant to Section 42457.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 42457.)
-------------------------------------------

42454.

On and after July 1, 2006, it is unlawful for a retailer to sell a rechargeable battery to a consumer unless the retailer complies with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 572, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Inoperative September 30, 2026, pursuant to Section 42457.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 42457.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Annual Return Data [42456. - 42456.]

42456.

(a) On or before July 1, 2007, and each July 1 thereafter, the department shall survey battery handling or battery recycling facilities, or both, for the data required for subdivision (b). The survey shall be a representative sample of facilities, as determined by the department.

(b) From the data obtained pursuant to subdivision (a), the department shall post on its Internet Web site the estimated amount, by weight, of each type of rechargeable batteries returned for recycling in California during the previous calendar year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 572, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.   Inoperative September 30, 2026, pursuant to Section 42457.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 42457.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Repeal [42457. - 42457.]

42457.

This chapter shall become inoperative on September 30, 2026, and, as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 351, Sec. 2.   (AB 2440)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Ch. 8.4, commencing with Section 42451.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.5. Electronic Waste Recycling [42460. - 42486.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [42460. - 42461.5.]

42460.

This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Electronic Waste Recycling Act of 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 526, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2004.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42461.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The purpose of this chapter is to enact a comprehensive and innovative system for the reuse, recycling, and proper and legal disposal of covered electronic devices, and to provide incentives to design electronic devices that are less toxic, more recyclable, and that use recycled materials.

(b) It is the further purpose of this chapter to enact a law that establishes a program that is cost free and convenient for consumers and the public to return, recycle, and ensure the safe and environmentally sound disposal of covered electronic devices.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the cost associated with the handling, recycling, and disposal of covered electronic devices is the responsibility of the producers and consumers of covered electronic devices, and not local government or their service providers, state government, or taxpayers.

(d) In order to reduce the likelihood of illegal disposal of these hazardous materials, it is the intent of this chapter to ensure that any cost associated with the proper management of covered electronic devices be internalized by the producers and consumers of covered electronic devices at or before the point of purchase, and not at the point of discard.

(e) Manufacturers of covered electronic devices, in working to achieve the goals and objectives of this chapter,
 should have the flexibility to partner with each other and with those public sector entities and business enterprises that currently provide collection and processing services to develop and promote a safe and effective covered electronic device recycling system for California.

(f) The producers of electronic products, components, and devices should reduce and, to the extent feasible, ultimately phase out the use of hazardous materials in those products.

(g) Electronic products, components, and devices, to the greatest extent feasible, should be designed for extended life, repair, and reuse.

(h) The purpose of the Electronic Waste Recycling Act of 2003 is to provide sufficient funding for the safe, cost-free, and convenient
 collection and recycling of 100 percent of the covered electronic waste initially discarded in the state, to eliminate electronic waste stockpiles and legacy devices by December 31, 2007, to end the illegal disposal of covered electronic devices, to establish manufacturer responsibility for reporting to the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery on the manufacturer’s efforts to phase out hazardous materials in electronic devices and increase the use of recycled materials, and to ensure that electronic devices sold in the state do not violate the regulations adopted by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Section 25214.10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 4.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42461.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the changes made by this act of the 2011–12 Regular Session of the Legislature to subdivision (h) of Section 42461, subdivision (g) of Section 42476, and subdivision (a) of Section 42479, clarify and strengthen the enforcement provisions of the act, so as to implement the Legislature’s intent when this chapter was first enacted on January 1, 2003.

(b) The changes specified in subdivision (a) shall not be interpreted as affecting an administrative or legal enforcement action that was filed before, or is pending on, January 1,
 2013, and shall not prevent the taking of a legal or administrative enforcement action that may be brought on or after January 1, 2013, with regard to any actions taken, or claims filed, before that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 43.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [42463. - 42463.]

42463.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

(a) “Account” means the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account created in the Integrated Waste Management Fund pursuant to Section 42476.

(b) “Authorized collector” means any of the following:

(1) A city, county, or district that collects covered electronic devices.

(2) A person or entity that is required or authorized by a city, county, or district to collect covered electronic devices pursuant to the terms of a contract, license, permit, or other written
 authorization.

(3) A nonprofit organization that collects or accepts covered electronic devices.

(4) A manufacturer or agent of the manufacturer that collects, consolidates, and transports covered electronic devices for recycling from consumers, businesses, institutions, and other generators.

(5) An entity that collects, handles, consolidates, and transports covered electronic devices and has filed applicable notifications with DTSC pursuant to Chapter 23 (commencing with Section 66273.1) of Division 4.5 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(c) “CalRecycle” means the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery.”

(d) “CDTFA” means the California Department of Tax and Fee
 Administration.

(e) “Consumer” means a person who purchases a new or refurbished covered electronic device in a transaction that is a retail sale or in a transaction to which a use tax applies pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(f) (1) “Covered battery-embedded product” means a product containing a battery from which the battery is not designed to be easily removed from the product by the user of the product with no more than commonly used household tools.

(2) “Covered battery-embedded product” does not include any of the following:

(A) A medical device, as defined in Section 321(h) of Title 21 of the United States Code, if either of the following applies:

(i) It is a Class I device as defined in Section 360c of Title 21 of the United States Code, and either of the following applies:

(I) It is a device described in Section 414.202 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(II) Either of the following applies:

(ia) The device is predominantly used in a health care setting by a provider.

(ib) The device is predominantly prescribed by a health care provider.

(ii) It is a Class II or Class III device as defined in 360c of Title 21 of the United States Code.

(B) A covered electronic device, as defined in
 subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g).

(C) An energy storage system, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 2835 of the Public Utilities Code.

(D) An electronic nicotine delivery system, as defined in Section 375(7) of Title 15 of the United States Code.

(3) CalRecycle may consult with other state agencies to determine if a product meets the definition of a covered battery-embedded product.

(4) “Covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee” means the fee imposed for covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g), pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 42464).

(g) (1) “Covered electronic device”
 means either of the following:

(A) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a video display device containing a screen greater than four inches, measured diagonally, that is identified in the regulations adopted by DTSC pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 25214.10.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Any covered battery-embedded product, as defined in subdivision (f).

(2) “Covered electronic device,” as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1), does not include any of the following:

(A) A video display device that is a part of a motor vehicle, as defined in Section 415 of the Vehicle Code, or any component part of a motor vehicle assembled by, or for, a vehicle manufacturer or franchised dealer, including replacement parts for use in a motor
 vehicle.

(B) A video display device that is contained within, or a part of a piece of industrial, commercial, or medical equipment, including monitoring or control equipment.

(C) A video display device that is contained within a clothes washer, clothes dryer, refrigerator, refrigerator and freezer, microwave oven, conventional oven or range, dishwasher, room air-conditioner, dehumidifier, or air purifier.

(D) An electronic device, on and after the date that it ceases to be a covered electronic device pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 25214.10.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(h) “Covered electronic waste” or “covered e-waste” means a covered electronic device that is discarded.

(i) “Covered electronic waste recycling fee” or “covered e-waste recycling fee” means the fee imposed for covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g), pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 42464).

(j) “Covered electronic waste recycler” or “covered e-waste recycler” means any of the following:

(1) A person who engages in the manual or mechanical separation of covered electronic devices to recover components and commodities contained therein for the purpose of reuse or recycling.

(2) A person who changes the physical or chemical composition of a covered electronic device, in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code and the regulations adopted pursuant to that
 chapter, by deconstructing, size reduction, crushing, cutting, sawing, compacting, shredding, or refining for purposes of segregating components, for purposes of recovering or recycling those components, and who arranges for the transport of those components to an end user.

(3) A manufacturer who meets any conditions established by this chapter and Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 25100) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code for the collection or recycling of covered electronic waste.

(k) “Director” means the Director of Resources Recycling and Recovery.

(l) “Discarded” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 25124 of the Health and Safety Code.

(m) “DTSC” means the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(n) “Electronic waste recovery payment” means an amount established and paid by CalRecycle pursuant to Section 42477.

(o) “Electronic waste recycling payment” means an amount established and paid by CalRecycle pursuant to Section 42478.

(p) “Hazardous material” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 25501 of the Health and Safety Code.

(q) (1) (A) “Manufacturer” means a person who manufactures a covered electronic device and who owns or is the exclusive licensee of the brand or trademark under which the covered electronic device is sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state.

(B) If there is no person in the state who is the
 manufacturer for purposes of subparagraph (A), the manufacturer of the covered electronic device is the owner or licensee of a brand or trademark under which a covered electronic device is sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state.

(C) If there is no person in the state who is the manufacturer for purposes of subparagraph (A) or (B), the manufacturer of the covered electronic device is the person who sells, offers for sale, or distributes the covered electronic device into the state for sale, offer for sale, or distribution in the state.

(2) For purposes of this chapter, the sale of a covered electronic device shall be deemed to occur in the state if the covered electronic device is delivered to the purchaser in the state.

(r) “Person” means an individual, trust firm, joint stock company, business concern,
 and corporation, including, but not limited to, a government corporation, partnership, limited liability company, and association. Notwithstanding Section 40170, “person” also includes a city, county, city and county, district, commission, the state or a department, agency, or political subdivision thereof, an interstate body, and the United States and its agencies and instrumentalities to the extent permitted by law.

(s) “Recycling” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 25121.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(t) “Refurbished,” when used to describe a covered electronic device, means a device that the manufacturer has tested and returned to a condition that meets factory specifications for the device, has repackaged, and has labeled as refurbished.

(u) “Retailer” means a person who makes a
 retail sale of a new or refurbished covered electronic device. “Retailer” includes a manufacturer of a covered electronic device who sells that covered electronic device directly to a consumer through any means, including, but not limited to, a transaction conducted through a sales outlet, catalog, or the Internet, or any other similar electronic means.

(v) (1) “Retail sale” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 6007 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(2) “Retail sale” does not include the sale of a covered electronic device that is temporarily stored or used in the state for the sole purpose of preparing the covered electronic device for use thereafter solely outside the state, and that is subsequently transported outside the state and thereafter used solely outside the state.

(w) “Vendor” means a person that makes a sale of a covered electronic device for the purpose of resale to a retailer who is the lessor of the covered electronic device to a consumer under a lease that is a continuing sale and purchase pursuant to Part 1 (commencing with Section 6001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(x) “Video display device” means an electronic device with an output surface that displays, or is capable of displaying, moving graphical images or a visual representation of image sequences or pictures, showing a number of quickly changing images on a screen in fast succession to create the illusion of motion, including, if applicable, a device that is an integral part of the display, in that it cannot be easily removed from the display by the consumer, that produces the moving image on the screen. A video display device may use, but is not limited to, a cathode ray tube (CRT), liquid crystal display
 (LCD), gas plasma, digital light processing, or other image projection technology.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 197.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Covered Electronic Waste Recycling Fees and Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fees [42464. - 42464.8.]

42464.

(a) On and after January 1, 2005, or as otherwise provided by Section 25214.10.1 of the Health and Safety Code, a consumer shall pay a covered electronic waste recycling fee upon the purchase of a new or refurbished covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463 in the following amounts:

(1) Six dollars ($6) for each covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, with a screen size of less than 15 inches measured diagonally.

(2) Eight dollars ($8) for each covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, with
 a screen size greater than or equal to 15 inches but less than 35 inches measured diagonally.

(3) Ten dollars ($10) for each covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, with a screen size greater than or equal to 35 inches measured diagonally.

(b) (1) On and after January 1, 2026, a consumer shall pay a covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee in an amount determined by CalRecycle pursuant to paragraph (3) upon the purchase of a new or refurbished covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463.

(2) Beginning on August 1, 2028, CalRecycle, in collaboration with DTSC, may establish more than one covered electronic waste recycling fee for covered battery-embedded
 waste recycling fee for covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, based on categories of covered battery-embedded products, as determined by CalRecycle in collaboration with DTSC.

(3) On or before October 1, 2025, and on or before October 1 each year thereafter, CalRecycle shall establish a covered electronic waste recycling fee based on the reasonable regulatory costs to administer covered electronic waste recycling. The fee shall be imposed upon the purchase of a new or refurbished covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463. The fee shall go into effect on January 1 of each calendar year after the fee is adopted. The maximum fee shall be adjusted annually based on the California Consumer Price Index as compiled and reported by the Department of Industrial Relations.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (e), a retailer shall collect from the consumer a covered electronic waste recycling fee or covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee, as applicable, at the time of the retail sale of a covered electronic device.

(d) (1) A retailer may retain 3 percent of the covered electronic waste recycling fee or covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee, as applicable, as reimbursement for all costs associated with collecting the fee and shall transmit the remainder of the fee to the state pursuant to Section 42464.4.

(2) If a retailer makes an election pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), and the conditions of subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) are met, the vendor, in lieu of the retailer, may retain 3 percent of the covered
 electronic waste recycling fee or covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee, as applicable, as reimbursement for all costs associated with collecting the fee and the vendor shall transmit the remainder of the fee to the state pursuant to Section 42464.4.

(e) (1) If a retailer elects to pay the covered electronic waste recycling fee or covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee, as applicable, on behalf of the consumer, the retailer shall provide an express statement to that effect on the receipt given to the consumer at the time of sale. If a retailer elects to pay the covered electronic waste recycling fee on behalf of the consumer, the fee is a debt owed by the retailer to the state, and the consumer is not liable for the fee.

(2) A retailer may elect to pay the covered electronic waste recycling fee or covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee, as
 applicable, on behalf of the consumer by paying the covered electronic waste recycling fee or covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee, as applicable, to the retailer’s vendor, but only if all of the following conditions are met:

(A) The vendor is registered with CDTFA to collect and remit the covered electronic waste recycling fee or covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee, as applicable, pursuant to this chapter.

(B) The vendor holds a valid seller’s permit pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 6066) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(C) The retailer pays the covered electronic waste recycling fee or covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee, as applicable, to the vendor that is separately stated on the vendor’s invoice to the retailer.

(D) The retailer provides an express statement on the invoice, contract, or other record documenting the sale that is given to the consumer, that the covered electronic waste recycling fee or covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee, as applicable, has been paid on behalf of the consumer.

(3) For the purpose of making the election in paragraph (2), if the conditions set forth in subparagraphs (A), (B), (C), and (D) of paragraph (2), are met, the covered electronic waste recycling fee or covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee, as applicable, is a debt owed by the vendor to the state, and the retailer is not liable for the fee.

(f) The retailer shall separately state the covered electronic waste recycling fee or covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee, as applicable, on the receipt given to the consumer at
 the time of sale.

(g) On or before August 1, 2005, and, thereafter, no more frequently than annually, and no less frequently than biennially, CalRecycle, in collaboration with DTSC, shall review, at a public hearing, the covered electronic waste recycling fee outlined in subdivision (a) and shall make any adjustments to the fee to ensure that there are sufficient revenues in the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account
 to fund the covered electronic waste recycling program, as related to covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463 and the resulting covered e-waste, established pursuant to this chapter. Adjustments to the fee that are made on or before August 1, shall apply to the calendar year beginning the following January 1. CalRecycle shall base an adjustment of the covered electronic waste recycling fees on both of the following factors:

(1) The sufficiency, and any surplus, of revenues in the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account to fund the collection, consolidation, and recycling of covered electronic waste resulting
 from covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, and the resulting covered e-waste, that is projected to be recycled in the state.

(2) The sufficiency of revenues in the
 Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account for CalRecycle and DTSC to administer, enforce, and promote the program established pursuant to this chapter, as related to covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463 and the resulting covered e-waste, plus a prudent reserve not to exceed 5 percent of the amount in the Electronic Waste Recovery and Recycling Account.

(h) Following the setting of the covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), on or before August 1, 2027, and, thereafter, no more frequently than annually, and no less frequently than
 biennially, CalRecycle, in collaboration with DTSC, shall review, at a public hearing, the covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee outlined in subdivision (b) and shall make any fair and reasonable adjustments to the fee to ensure that there are sufficient revenues in the Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount to fund the covered electronic waste recycling program established pursuant to this chapter related to covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, and the resulting covered e-waste. Adjustments to the fee that are made on or before August 1, shall apply to the calendar year beginning the following January 1. CalRecycle shall base an adjustment of the covered battery-embedded waste recycling fees on both of the following factors:

(1) The sufficiency, and any surplus, of revenues in the Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount to fund
 the collection, consolidation, and recycling of covered electronic waste resulting from discarded covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, that is projected to be recycled in the state.

(2) The sufficiency of revenues in the Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount for CalRecycle and DTSC to administer, enforce, and promote the program established pursuant to this chapter, related to covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, and the resulting covered e-waste, plus a prudent reserve not to exceed 5 percent of the amount in the Covered Battery-Embedded Waste Recycling Fee Subaccount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 72, Sec. 44.   (SB 156)   Effective July 2, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42464.2.

CDTFA shall collect the covered electronic waste recycling fee and the covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee pursuant to the Fee Collection Procedures Law (Part 30 (commencing with Section 55001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code). For purposes of this section, the reference in the Fee Collection Procedures Law to “feepayer” shall include a retailer, a consumer, and a vendor, in the case of a retailer’s election pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 42464.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 8.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42464.3.

CalRecycle and DTSC may share information provided pursuant to this article with CDTFA, upon request, as necessary to administer and enforce the covered electronic waste recycling fee and covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee imposed under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 848, Sec. 13.   (AB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42464.4.

(a) The covered electronic waste recycling fee and the covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee shall be due and payable quarterly on or before the last day of the month following each calendar quarter. The payments shall be accompanied by a return
 filed using electronic media. Returns shall be authenticated in a form or pursuant to methods as may be prescribed by CDTFA.

(b) CDTFA may require the payment of the fee and the filing of returns for other than quarterly periods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 10.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42464.6.

(a) CDTFA shall not accept or consider a petition for redetermination of fees determined under this chapter if the petition is founded upon the grounds that an item is or is not a covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463. CDTFA shall forward to DTSC any appeal of a determination that is based on the grounds that an item is or is not a covered electronic
 device, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463. CDTFA shall forward to CalRecycle any appeal of a determination that is based on the grounds that an item is or is not a covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463.

(b) CDTFA shall not accept or consider a claim for refund of fees paid pursuant to this chapter if the claim is founded upon the grounds that an item is or is not a covered electronic device. CDTFA shall forward to DTSC any claim for refund that is based on the grounds that an item is or is not a covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1)
 of subdivision (g) of Section 42463. CDTFA shall forward to CalRecycle any claim for refund that is based on the grounds that an item is or is not a covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 11.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42464.8.

Notwithstanding Section 55381 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, CDTFA may disclose the name, address, account number, and account status of a person registered with CDTFA to collect and remit the covered electronic waste recycling fee or the covered battery-embedded waste recycling fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 12.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Manufacturer Responsibility [42465. - 42467.]

42465.

On and after the date specified in subdivision (a) of, and paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of, Section 42464, a person shall not sell a new or refurbished covered electronic device to a consumer in this state if CalRecycle or DTSC determines that the manufacturer of that covered electronic device is not in compliance with this chapter or as provided otherwise by Section 25214.10.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 198.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42465.1.

On and after January 1, 2005, or as specified otherwise in Section 25214.10.1 of the Health and Safety Code, a person shall not sell or offer for sale in this state a new or refurbished covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, unless the device is labeled with the name of the manufacturer or the manufacturer’s brand label so that it is readily visible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 14.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42465.2.

(a) On or before July 1, 2005, or as specified otherwise in Section 25214.10.1 of the Health and Safety Code, and at least once annually thereafter as determined by CalRecycle, each manufacturer of a covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, sold in this state shall do all of the following:

(1) Submit to CalRecycle a report that includes all of the following information:

(A) An estimate of the number of covered electronic
 devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, sold by the manufacturer in the state during the previous year.

(B) A baseline or set of baselines that show the total estimated amounts of mercury, cadmium, lead, hexavalent chromium, and polybrominated biphenyls (PBBs) used in covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, manufactured by the manufacturer in that year and the reduction in the use of those hazardous materials from the previous year.

(C) A baseline
 or set of baselines that show the total estimated amount of recycled materials contained in covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, sold by the manufacturer in that year and the increase in the use of those recycled materials from the previous year.

(D) A baseline or a set of baselines that describe any efforts to design covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, for
 recycling and goals and plans for further increasing design for recycling.

(E) A list of those retailers, including, but not limited to, Internet and catalog retailers, to which the manufacturer provided a notice in the prior 12 months pursuant to Section 42465.3 and subdivision (d) of Section 25214.10.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) Make information available to consumers that describes where and how to return, recycle, and dispose of the covered electronic
 waste resulting from discarded electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, and opportunities and locations for the collection or return of the device, through the use of a toll-free telephone number, internet website, information labeled on the device, information included in the packaging, or information accompanying the sale of the covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463.

(b) (1) For purposes of complying with paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a manufacturer may submit a report to CalRecycle that
 includes only those covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, that include applications of the compounds listed in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) that are exempt from the Directive 2002/95/EC adopted by the European Parliament and the Council of the European Union on January 27, 2003, and any amendments made to that directive, if both of the following conditions are met, as modified by Section 24214.10 of the Health and Safety Code:

(A) The manufacturer submits written verification to DTSC that demonstrates, to DTSC’s satisfaction, that the manufacturer is in compliance with Directive
 2002/95/EC, and any amendments to that directive, for those covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, for which it is not submitting a report to CalRecycle pursuant to this subdivision.

(B) DTSC certifies that the manufacturer is in compliance with Directive 2002/95/EC, and any amendments to that directive, for those covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, for which the
 manufacturer is not submitting a report to CalRecycle pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) When reporting pursuant to this subdivision, a manufacturer is required only to report on specific applications of compounds used in covered electronic devices, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, that are exempt from Directive 2002/95/EC.

(c) Any information submitted to CalRecycle pursuant to subdivision (a) that is proprietary in nature or a trade secret shall be subject to protection under state laws and regulations governing that
 information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 15.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42465.3.

A manufacturer of a covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, shall comply with the notification requirements of subdivision (d) of Section 25214.10.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 16.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42466.1.

(a) On and after January 1, 2026, a person shall not sell or offer for sale in this state a new or refurbished covered electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, unless the item is labeled with the name of the manufacturer or the manufacturer’s brand label so that it is readily visible.

(b) A new or refurbished covered
 electronic device, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, battery-embedded product shall either be labeled with information identifying the chemistry of the
 battery contained within the covered electronic devices sold by the manufacturer or include that information on the manufacturer’s internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 370, Sec. 17.   (SB 1215)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Sections 42485 and 42486.)
-------------------------------------------

42466.2.

(a) A manufacturer of a “covered electronic device,” as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (g) of Section 42463, shall send a notice in accordance with the schedule specified in paragraph (1) or (2), as applicable, of subdivision (c), to any retailer that sells that covered